ru_RU.aff
SFX U Y 162
SFX U   чься жешься       чься
SFX U   чься жется        чься
SFX U   чься жетесь       чься
SFX U   чься жемся        чься
SFX U   чься жёшься       чься
SFX U   чься жётся        чься
SFX U   чься жётесь       чься
SFX U   чься жёмся        чься
SFX U   чься гутся        чься
SFX U   чься гусь         чься
SFX U   чь   жешь         чь
SFX U   чь   жете         чь
SFX U   чь   жет          чь
SFX U   чь   жем          чь
SFX U   чь   жёшь         чь
SFX U   чь   жёте         чь
SFX U   чь   жёт          чь
SFX U   чь   жём          чь
SFX U   чь   гут          чь
SFX U   чь   гу           чь
SFX U   ься  ся           уться
SFX U   ься  ся           ояться
SFX U   ься  ся           [жшщч]аться
SFX U   ваться ешься        аваться
SFX U   ваться ется         аваться
SFX U   ваться етесь        аваться
SFX U   ваться емся         аваться
SFX U   ваться ются         аваться
SFX U   ваться юсь          аваться
SFX U   ваться ёшься        аваться
SFX U   ваться ётся         аваться
SFX U   ваться ётесь        аваться
SFX U   ваться ёмся         аваться
SFX U   вать ешь          авать
SFX U   вать ете          авать
SFX U   вать ет           авать
SFX U   вать ем           авать
SFX U   вать ют           авать
SFX U   вать ю            авать
SFX U   вать ёшь          авать
SFX U   вать ёте          авать
SFX U   вать ёт           авать
SFX U   вать ём           авать
SFX U   уться ешься        уться
SFX U   уться ется         уться
SFX U   уться етесь        уться
SFX U   уться емся         уться
SFX U   уться ёшься        уться
SFX U   уться ётся         уться
SFX U   уться ётесь        уться
SFX U   уться ёмся         уться
SFX U   уть  у            уть
SFX U   уть  ешь          уть
SFX U   уть  ете          уть
SFX U   уть  ет           уть
SFX U   уть  ем           уть
SFX U   уть  ёшь          уть
SFX U   уть  ёте          уть
SFX U   уть  ёт           уть
SFX U   уть  ём           уть
SFX U   ться сь           уться
SFX U   ться ешься        [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться ется         [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться етесь        [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться емся         [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться ются         [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ться юсь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX U   ть   т            уть
SFX U   ть   т            оять
SFX U   ть   т            [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ть   ешь          [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть   ете          [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть   ет           [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть   ем           [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть   ют           [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   ть   ю            [^аеоу]ять
SFX U   яться ишься        ояться
SFX U   яться ится         ояться
SFX U   яться итесь        ояться
SFX U   яться имся         ояться
SFX U   яться ешься        [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться ется         [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться етесь        [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться емся         [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться ются         [аеу]яться
SFX U   яться юсь          [аеоу]яться
SFX U   ять  ишь          оять
SFX U   ять  ите          оять
SFX U   ять  ит           оять
SFX U   ять  им           оять
SFX U   ять  ешь          [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять  ете          [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять  ет           [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять  ем           [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять  ют           [аеу]ять
SFX U   ять  ю            [аеоу]ять
SFX U   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX U   оваться уется        оваться
SFX U   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX U   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX U   оваться уются        оваться
SFX U   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX U   овать уешь         овать
SFX U   овать уете         овать
SFX U   овать ует          овать
SFX U   овать уем          овать
SFX U   овать уют          овать
SFX U   овать ую           овать
SFX U   еваться уешься       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться уетесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться уемся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться уюсь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX U   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX U   аться утся         даться
SFX U   аться усь          даться
SFX U   аться усь          [жшщч]аться
SFX U   аться ишься        [жшщч]аться
SFX U   аться ится         [жшщч]аться
SFX U   аться итесь        [жшщч]аться
SFX U   аться имся         [жшщч]аться
SFX U   аться ешься        даться
SFX U   аться ется         даться
SFX U   аться етесь        даться
SFX U   аться емся         даться
SFX U   аться ёшься        даться
SFX U   аться ётся         даться
SFX U   аться ётесь        даться
SFX U   аться ёмся         даться
SFX U   ать  ут           дать
SFX U   ать  у            дать
SFX U   ать  у            [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ать  ишь          [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ать  ите          [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ать  ит           [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ать  им           [жшщч]ать
SFX U   ать  ешь          дать
SFX U   ать  ете          дать
SFX U   ать  ет           дать
SFX U   ать  ем           дать
SFX U   ать  ёшь          дать
SFX U   ать  ёте          дать
SFX U   ать  ёт           дать
SFX U   ать  ём           дать

SFX T Y 38
SFX T   уться ьтесь        уться
SFX T   уться ься          уться
SFX T   уть  ьте          уть
SFX T   уть  ь            уть
SFX T   саться шитесь       саться
SFX T   саться шись         саться
SFX T   сать шите         сать
SFX T   сать ши           сать
SFX T   яться йтесь        [аеоу]яться
SFX T   яться йся          [аеоу]яться
SFX T   ять  йте          [аеоу]ять
SFX T   ять  й            [аеоу]ять
SFX T   оваться уйтесь       оваться
SFX T   оваться уйся         оваться
SFX T   овать уйте         овать
SFX T   овать уй           овать
SFX T   иться ьтесь        [^аео]иться
SFX T   иться ься          [^аео]иться
SFX T   иться йтесь        [аео]иться
SFX T   иться йся          [аео]иться
SFX T   ить  ьте          [^аео]ить
SFX T   ить  ь            [^аео]ить
SFX T   ить  йте          [аео]ить
SFX T   ить  й            [аео]ить
SFX T   еваться уйтесь       [цжшщч]еваться
SFX T   еваться уйся         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX T   еваться юйтесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX T   еваться юйся         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX T   евать уйте         [цжшщч]евать
SFX T   евать уй           [цжшщч]евать
SFX T   евать юйте         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX T   евать юй           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX T   еться итесь        еться
SFX T   еться ись          еться
SFX T   еть  ите          еть
SFX T   еть  и            еть
SFX T   аться ись          [жч]аться
SFX T   ать  и            [жч]ать
